District of Columbia statutes.
32-1533

Penalty for misrepresentation.

Any person who willfully makes any false or misleading statement or representation for the purpose of obtaining any benefit or payment under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not to exceed $1,000 or by imprisonment of not to exceed 1 year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

July 1, 1980, D.C. Law 3-77, § 34, 27 DCR 2503
1981 Ed., § 36-333.